Illinois, session 104th, HB3887.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4ARTICLE 15    Section 5. The amount of $5,753,700, or so much thereof as 6may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 7Fund to the Board of Higher Education to meet its operational 8expenses for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 9    Section 10. The sum of $458,100, or so much thereof as may 10be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 11the Board of Higher Education for costs and expenses 12associated with the administration and enforcement associated 13with the P-20 Longitudinal Education Data System Act. 14    Section 15. The sum of $183,300, or so much thereof as may 15be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 16the Board of Higher Education for costs associated with the My 17Credits Transfer System. 18    Section 20. The sum of $2,450,000, or so much thereof as 19may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 20Fund to the Board of Higher Education for administrative,   HB3887- 2 -OMB104 00121 LAP 10121 b1personnel, and programmatic costs, including prior years' 2costs, for all post-secondary admission-related services and 3programs including, but not limited to, the development and 4implementation of Common App and other post-secondary 5admissions-related systems at public institutions of higher 6education. 7    Section 25. The following named amount, or so much thereof 8as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 9Fund to the Board of Higher Education for distribution as 10grants authorized by the Higher Education Cooperation Act:11  Quad-Cities Graduate Study Center....................73,800 12    Section 30. The following named sums, or so much thereof 13as may be necessary, are appropriated from the General Revenue 14Fund to the Illinois Board of Higher Education for Science, 15Technology, Engineering and Math (S.T.E.M.) diversity 16initiatives to enhance S.T.E.M. programs for students from 17underrepresented groups:18  Illinois Mathematics and Science19   Academy Fusion Program..............................95,900 20    Section 35. The sum of $1,433,600, or so much thereof as 21may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 22Fund to the Illinois Board of Higher Education for Science, 23Technology, Engineering and Math (S.T.E.M.) diversity   HB3887- 3 -OMB104 00121 LAP 10121 b1initiatives to enhance S.T.E.M. programs for students from 2underrepresented groups for the Creating Pathways and Access 3For Student Success Foundation formerly Chicago Area Health 4and Medical Careers Program (C.A.H.M.C.P.). 5    Section 40. The sum of $6,000,000, or so much thereof as 6may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 7Fund to the Board of Higher Education for the Grow Your Own 8Teachers Program, including prior years' costs. 9    Section 45. The sum of $2,050,200, or so much thereof as 10may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 11Fund to the Board of Higher Education for the administration 12and distribution of grants authorized by the Diversifying 13Higher Education Faculty in Illinois Program. 14    Section 50. The sum of $1,500,000, or so much thereof as 15may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 16Fund to the Board of Higher Education for competitive grants 17for nursing schools to increase the number of graduating 18nurses. 19    Section 55. The sum of $800,000, or so much thereof as may 20be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 21the Board of Higher Education for nurse educator fellowships 22to supplement nurse faculty salaries.   HB3887- 4 -OMB104 00121 LAP 10121 b1    Section 60. The sum of $980,500, or so much thereof as may 2be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 3the Board of Higher Education for distribution as grants for 4Cooperative Work Study Programs to institutions of higher 5education. 6    Section 65. The sum of $1,055,700, or so much thereof as 7may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 8Fund to the Board of Higher Education for a grant to the Board 9of Trustees of the University Center of Lake County for the 10ordinary and contingent expenses of the Center. 11    Section 70. The sum of $307,000, or so much thereof as 12maybe necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund 13to the Board of Higher Education for costs and expenses 14associated with the implementation of the new strategic plan. 15    Section 75. The sum of $2,000,000, or so much thereof as 16may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 17Fund to the Board of Higher Education for grants and 18administration of a program to address basic needs insecurity, 19including housing and homelessness prevention, for students at 20four-year colleges and universities. 21    Section 80. The sum of $450,000, or so much thereof as may   HB3887- 5 -OMB104 00121 LAP 10121 b1be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 2the Board of Higher Education for costs and expenses, 3including administrative and personnel costs associated with 4the Higher Education Accountability Dashboard program. 5    Section 85. The sum of $200,000, or so much thereof as may 6be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 7the Board of Higher Education for costs and expenses, 8including administrative and personnel costs associated with 9the Sexual Misconduct on Campus Climate Survey program. 10    Section 90. The sum of $7,000,000, or so much thereof as 11may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 12Fund to the Illinois Board of Higher Education for the 13administration and distribution of grants for the 14implementation of the Mental Health Early Action on Campus 15Act. 16    Section 95. The sum of $1,000,000, or so much of that sum 17as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 18Fund to the Board of Higher Education for a grant to an 19organization that manages a state-wide coordinated strategy 20that includes, but is not limited to, the following services: 21data analytics, multi-channel marketing, live professional 22coaching, and a platform-based user experience to re-enroll 23State residents with some college and no credential into   HB3887- 6 -OMB104 00121 LAP 10121 b1public higher education, apprenticeship, and workforce 2training programs. 3    Section 100. The sum of $150,000 or so much thereof as may 4be necessary, is appropriated from the Distance Learning Fund 5to the Board of Higher Education as supplemental support for 6costs and expenses associated with the administration and 7enforcement of 110 ILCS 145/40. 8    Section 105. The amount of $800,000, or so much thereof as 9may be necessary, is appropriated from the Academic Quality 10Assurance Fund to the Board of Higher Education as 11supplemental support for costs and expenses associated with 12the administration and enforcement of 110 ILCS 1010. 13    Section 110. The amount of $30,000, or so much thereof as 14may be necessary, is appropriated from the BHE Data and 15Research Cost Recovery Fund to the Board of Higher Education 16as supplemental support for costs and expenses associated with 17the administration and enforcement of 110 ILCS 205. 18    Section 115. The amount of $650,000, or so much thereof as 19may be necessary, is appropriated from the Private Business 20and Vocational Schools Quality Assurance Fund to the Board of 21Higher Education as supplemental support for costs and 22expenses associated with the administration and enforcement of   HB3887- 7 -OMB104 00121 LAP 10121 b1the Private Business and Vocational Schools Act of 2012. 2    Section 120. The sum of $10,000,000, or so much thereof as 3may be necessary, is appropriated from the Board of Higher 4Education State Contracts and Grants Fund to the Board of 5Higher Education for costs and expenses associated with 6Community Behavioral Health Workforce Education Center. 7    Section 125. The sum of $5,000,000, or so much thereof as 8may be necessary, is appropriated from the Board of Higher 9Education State Contracts and Grants Fund to the Board of 10Higher education to be expended under the terms and conditions 11associated with the moneys being received, including prior 12years' expenditures. 13    Section 130. The sum of $5,500,000, or so much thereof as 14may be necessary, is appropriated from the BHE Federal Grants 15Fund to the Board of Higher Education to be expended under the 16terms and conditions associated with the federal contracts and 17grants moneys received, including prior years' costs. 18    Section 135. The following named amounts, or so much 19thereof as may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and 20purposes hereinafter named, are appropriated from the 21Education Assistance Fund to the Illinois Mathematics and 22Science Academy to meet ordinary and contingent expenses for   HB3887- 8 -OMB104 00121 LAP 10121 b1the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026:2  For Personal Services............................17,016,3003  For State Contributions to State4   Employees Retirement System..............................05  For Retirement.......................................14,4006  For State Contributions to Social7   Security, for Medicare.............................245,7008  For Contractual Services..........................6,000,0009  For Travel...........................................80,00010  For Commodities.....................................515,00011  For Equipment.......................................672,00012  For Electronic Data Processing......................147,00013  For Telecommunication Services......................138,60014  For Operation of Automotive Equipment...............190,60015    Total                                         $25,019,600 16    Section 140. The following named amounts, or so much 17thereof as may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and 18purposes hereinafter named, are appropriated from the IMSA 19Income Fund to the Illinois Mathematics and Science Academy to 20meet ordinary and contingent expenses for the fiscal year 21ending June 30, 2026:22  For Personal Services.............................3,502,00023  For State Contributions to Social24   Security, for Medicare..............................71,20025  For Retirement.......................................22,800  HB3887- 9 -OMB104 00121 LAP 10121 b1  For Contractual Services............................805,6002  For Travel..........................................156,6003  For Commodities.....................................572,4004  For Equipment.......................................476,1005  For EDP..............................................45,2006  For Telecommunication Services.......................82,4007  For Operation of Automotive Equipment.................5,2008  For Refunds.........................................125,5009    Total                                          $5,865,000 10    Section 145. The sum of $60,000, or so much thereof as may 11be necessary, is appropriated from the IMSA Income Fund to the 12Illinois Mathematics and Science Academy for awards and 13grants. 14    Section 150. The sum of $1,434,967, or so much thereof as 15may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of 16business on June 30, 2025, from a reappropriation heretofore 17made for such purpose in Article 116, Section 150 of Public Act 18103-0589, as amended, is reappropriated from the General 19Revenue Fund to the Illinois Mathematics and Science Academy 20for personnel and operational costs relating to creating a 21philanthropic office in order to raise funds for its capital 22facilities. 23ARTICLE 2  HB3887- 10 -OMB104 00121 LAP 10121 b1    Section 5. The sum of $122,111, or so much thereof as may 2be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of business 3on June 30, 2025, from appropriations heretofore made such 4purpose in Article 130, Section 400 of Public Act 103-0589 as 5amended, is reappropriated from the State Coronavirus Urgent 6Remediation Emergency Fund to the Board of Higher Education to 7the Grow Your Own Teachers Program for costs and expenses 8associated with the Historically Disadvantaged Male 9Initiative, including but not limited to, for purposes 10permitted by Section 9901 of the American Rescue Plan Act of 112021 and related federal guidance, including prior years' 12costs. 13    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 142025.